North Dakota statutes. TITLE 38 Mining and Gas and Oil Production
CHAPTER 38-13 Oil and Gas Instruments — Interests of Absent Persons [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 312, § 2]

38-13-01.
Appointment of trustee to execute mineral lease and other documents if owner or claimant is absent — Administration of trust.

Repealed by S.L. 2007, 1048, § 2.

Note.

Section 38-13-01 was amended by section 12 of chapter 549, S.L. 2007. Pursuant to section 1-02-09, the section is treated as repealed.

38-13-02.
Who may institute proceedings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, 1048, § 2.

38-13-03.
Disposition of income and royalties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, 1048, § 2.

38-13-04.
Filing of addresses. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, 1048, § 2.